Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Form and Effect of Deeds of Trust; Sales Thereunder; Assignments; Releases.

§ 55.1-316.
Form of deed of trust to secure debts, etc.

A deed of trust to secure debts or indemnify sureties may be in the following form, or to the same effect: “This deed, made the
_______________ , in the year
_______________ , between
_______________
(the grantor) and
_______________
(the trustee), witnesseth: that the said
_______________
(the grantor) does (or do) grant (or grant and convey) unto the said
_______________
(the trustee), the following property (here describe it): In trust to secure (here describe the debts to be secured or the sureties to be indemnified and insert covenants or any other provisions the parties may agree upon). Witness the following signature (or signatures).”

History.

Code 1919, § 5166; Code 1950, § 55-58; 1990, c. 374; 2014, c. 338; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 131, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The City of Danville is hereby authorized to establish a pilot project regarding recordation of deeds subject to liens for unpaid taxes in accordance with the provisions of this act. Such pilot project may only be established by ordinance adopted by the city council after a public hearing.

“§ 2. Such ordinance may provide that no deed conveying a parcel of real property that has an assessed value for taxation of $50,000 or less located in the City of Danville shall be recorded by the clerk unless the city director of finance or his designee has certified on the face of such deed that there are no liens against such real property for unpaid local taxes or for other fines or charges assessed by the city that rank on a parity with liens for unpaid taxes and are enforceable in the same manner.

“§ 3. The provisions of this act shall not apply to (i) any deeds of trust; (ii) any deeds of easement; (iii) any deeds in which a public service company, railroad, or cable system operator is either a grantor or grantee; (iv) any deeds prepared under the supervision of the Office of the Attorney General of Virginia; (v) any deeds conveying property to the Danville Redevelopment and Housing Authority as grantee; and (vi) any deeds conveying a parcel of real property pursuant to Chapter 39 (§

58.1-3900

et seq.) of Title 58.1 of the Code of Virginia.

“§ 4. The clerk shall be immune from suit arising from any acts or omissions relating to the pilot project pursuant to this act unless the clerk was grossly negligent or engaged in willful misconduct.”

Acts 2017, c. 131, cl. 2 provides: “That if such pilot project is established, the City of Danville shall make a written report to the Virginia Housing Commission on or before May 31, 2020.”

Acts 2017, c. 131, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2021.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article on the mechanics of an examination of title to real property in Virginia, see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 471 (1977).

§ 55.1-317.
Requirements for trustees.

No person may be named or act, in person or by agent or attorney, as the trustee of a deed of trust conveying property to secure the payment of money or the performance of an obligation, either individually or as one of several trustees, unless such person is a resident of the Commonwealth. No corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity may be named or act as the trustee or as one of the trustees of a deed of trust conveying property to secure the payment of money or the performance of an obligation, unless it is organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or of the United States. However, the foregoing requirements shall not apply to any deed of trust conveying property lying partly in the Commonwealth and partly outside the Commonwealth or to a deed of trust conveying property in the Commonwealth to secure bonds or obligations that are also secured by one or more deeds of trust or mortgages conveying property outside of the Commonwealth.

A deed of trust conveying property to secure the payment of money or the performance of an obligation shall state the full residence or business address of the trustee named in such deed of trust, including street address and zip code, and such address shall be valid for purposes of all notices under the deed of trust to the trustee. Such address of the trustee may be changed by amendment of the deed of trust or by a separate instrument executed by the trustee, or by the beneficiary of such deed of trust, stating the changed address and otherwise in recordable form, and recorded in the office of the clerk of the circuit court where the deed of trust was recorded.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, if any deed of trust is recorded by a clerk, it shall be conclusively presumed that such deed of trust complies with all the requirements of this section, and it shall be deemed to be validly recorded.

All deeds of trusts, mortgages, bonds, or other instruments recorded by a clerk prior to January 1, 1999, without the residence or business address of the trustee named in such deed of trust shall be valid for all purposes as if such address had been named if such recordation is otherwise valid according to the law then in force, provided that this section shall not affect any right or remedy of any third party that accrued after the recordation of such instrument or before July 1, 1960.

History.

1960, c. 565, § 55-58.1; 1962, c. 156; 1966, c. 398; 1974, c. 424; 1998, c. 202; 2014, c. 338; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 99; 15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 10.

§ 55.1-318.
Credit line deed of trust defined; relative priority of credit line deed of trust and other instruments of judgment.

For the purpose of this section:“Beneficiary” means the noteholder, lender, or other party or parties identified in the credit line deed of trust as secured thereby. In the case of a credit line deed of trust that identifies a party acting as agent for all of the lenders or parties secured by a credit line deed of trust, such agent shall be the beneficiary for purposes of this section.“Credit line deed of trust” means any deed of trust, mortgage, bond, or other instrument entered into after July 1, 1982, in which title to real property located in the Commonwealth is conveyed, transferred, encumbered, or pledged to secure payment of money, including advances or other extensions of credit to be made in the future.

A credit line deed of trust shall set forth on the front page, either in capital letters or in language underscored, the words “THIS IS A CREDIT LINE DEED OF TRUST.” Such phrase shall convey notice to all parties that advances or other extensions of credit are to be made or are contemplated to be made from time to time against the security described in the credit line deed of trust. Such credit line deed of trust shall specify the maximum aggregate amount of principal to be secured at any one time.

From the date and actual time of the recording of a credit line deed of trust, the lien shall have priority (i) as to all other deeds, conveyances, or other instruments, or contracts in writing, that are unrecorded as of such date and time of recording and of which the beneficiary has no knowledge or notice and (ii) as to judgment liens subsequently docketed, except as provided in subsection D. Such priority shall extend to any advances or other extensions of credit made following the recordation of the credit line deed of trust. Amounts outstanding, together with interest, and other items provided by §

55.1-320

, shall continue to have priority until paid or curtailed. Mechanics’ liens created under Title 43 shall continue to enjoy the same priority as created by that title. Purchase money security interests in goods and fixtures shall have the same priority as provided in Subpart 3 (§

8.9A-317

et seq.) of Part 3 of Title 8.9A.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A, B, and C, if a judgment creditor gives written notice to the beneficiary of record at the address indicated in the credit line deed of trust, such credit line deed of trust shall have no priority as to such judgment for any advances or extensions of credit made under such credit line deed of trust from the day following receipt of that notice except those that have been unconditionally and irrevocably committed prior to such date.

In addition to the language specified in subsection B, the credit line deed of trust shall set forth the name of the beneficiary and the address at which communications may be mailed or delivered to the beneficiary. Such name or address may be changed or modified by duly recorded instrument executed by the beneficiary only. If the note or indebtedness secured by the credit line deed of trust is assigned or transferred, the name and address of the new beneficiary may be set forth in the certificate of transfer provided by §

55.1-336

. Such original name or address, or if changed, such changed name or address, shall be the address for delivery of notices contemplated by this section. Receipt of notice at such address shall be deemed receipt by the beneficiary.

The grantor may require at any time a modification under the credit line deed of trust whereby any priority over subsequently recorded deeds of trust is surrendered as to future advances or other extensions of credit, which advances or extensions of credit are in the discretion of the party secured by the credit line deed of trust.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A, B, and C, if a deed of trust under this section is a subordinate mortgage, as defined in subsection A of §

55.1-319

, upon the recording of a refinance mortgage, as defined in subsection A of §

55.1-319

, the credit line deed of trust shall retain the same subordinate position with respect to the refinance mortgage as it had with the prior mortgage, as defined in subsection A of § 55.1-319, provided that the refinance mortgage complies with the requirements of § 55.1-319.

History.

1982, c. 230, § 55-58.2; 1983, c. 124; 1984, c. 19; 1989, c. 346; 1997, c. 205; 2000, c. 971; 2014, c. 338; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to loans secured by a subordinate deed of trust or mortgage, see §

6.2-327

. As to limitations of actions on credit line deeds of trust when no maturity date is given, see §

8.01-242

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-318.1.
Effect of amendment to loan document on deed of trust.

A deed of trust that has been recorded and that states that it secures indebtedness or other obligations under a loan document and that it also secures indebtedness or other obligations under such loan document as it may be amended, modified, supplemented, or restated shall secure such loan document as amended, modified, supplemented, or restated from time to time, without the necessity of recording an amendment to such deed of trust and without regard to whether any such amendment, modification, supplement, or restatement may otherwise constitute a novation of the indebtedness or other obligations under the loan document, and shall have the same priority as the priority of the original deed of trust recorded. The foregoing provision shall not apply to any amendment, modification, supplement, or restatement of such loan document if (i) the deed of trust securing such loan document conveys an interest in residential real estate containing not more than one dwelling unit or (ii) such amendment, modification, supplement, or restatement of such loan document (a) increases the aggregate amount of the principal of the indebtedness secured by the original deed of trust, (b) changes or substitutes the noteholder, lender, or agent of any lender named in the original loan document, or (c) extends the maturity date of the indebtedness or obligation secured if such maturity date was set forth in the original deed of trust, and the effect of any such amendment, modification, supplement, or restatement shall be governed by the law that would otherwise apply without regard to this section. For the purposes of this section, “loan document” includes a note, loan agreement, credit agreement, or other document evidencing a loan or other indebtedness.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 13.

§ 55.1-319.
Priority of residential refinance mortgage over subordinate mortgage.

As used in this section:“Prior mortgage” means a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument encumbering or conveying an interest in residential real estate containing not more than one dwelling unit to secure a financing.“Refinance mortgage” means a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument encumbering or conveying an interest in residential real estate containing not more than one dwelling unit to secure a refinancing.“Refinancing” means the replacement of a loan secured by a prior mortgage with a new loan secured by a refinance mortgage and the payment in full of the debt owed under the original loan secured by the prior mortgage.“Subordinate mortgage” means a mortgage or deed of trust securing an original principal amount not exceeding $150,000, encumbering or conveying an interest in residential real estate containing not more than one dwelling unit that is subordinate in priority (i) under subdivision A 1 of §

55.1-407

or (ii) as a result of a previous refinancing.

Upon the refinancing of a prior mortgage, a subordinate mortgage shall retain the same subordinate position with respect to a refinance mortgage as the subordinate mortgage had with the prior mortgage, provided that:

Such refinance mortgage states on the first page thereof in bold or capitalized letters: “THIS IS A REFINANCE OF A (DEED OF TRUST, MORTGAGE OR OTHER SECURITY INTEREST) RECORDED IN THE CLERK’S OFFICE, CIRCUIT COURT OF (NAME OF COUNTY OR CITY), VIRGINIA, IN DEED BOOK , PAGE , IN THE ORIGINAL PRINCIPAL AMOUNT OF , AND WITH THE OUTSTANDING PRINCIPAL BALANCE WHICH IS WHICH HAD AN INTEREST RATE OF % PER ANNUM.”;

Click to view

The principal amount secured by such refinance mortgage does not exceed the outstanding principal balance secured by the prior mortgage plus $5,000; and

The interest rate of the refinance mortgage at the time it is recorded does not exceed the interest rate of the prior mortgage. The interest rate of the prior mortgage shall be stated on the first page of the refinance mortgage.

The priorities among two or more subordinate mortgages shall be governed by subdivision A 1 of §

55.1-407

.

The provisions of subsection B shall not apply to a subordinate mortgage securing a promissory note payable to any locality or any agency, authority, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth if such subordinate mortgage is financed pursuant to an affordable dwelling unit ordinance adopted pursuant to §

15.2-2304

or

15.2-2305

, or pursuant to any program authorized by federal or state law or local ordinance or resolution, for (i) low-income and moderate-income persons or households or (ii) improvements to residential potable water supplies and sanitary sewage disposal systems made to address an existing or potential public health hazard, and which mortgage, if recorded on or after July 1, 2003, states on the first page thereof in bold or capitalized letters: “THIS (DEED OF TRUST, MORTGAGE OR OTHER SECURITY INTEREST) SHALL NOT, WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE SECURED PARTY HEREUNDER, BE SUBORDINATED UPON THE REFINANCING OF ANY PRIOR MORTGAGE.”

History.

2000, c. 971, § 55-58.3; 2002, c. 172; 2003, c. 381; 2011, c. 77; 2014, c. 338; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 13.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 13, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subdivision B 3, which read “The interest rate is stated in the refinance mortgage at the time it is recorded and does not exceed the interest rate set forth in the prior mortgage.”

§ 55.1-320.
How deed of trust construed; duties, rights, etc., of parties.

Every deed of trust to secure debts or indemnify sureties is in the nature of a contract and shall be construed according to its terms to the extent not in conflict with the requirements of law. Unless the deed of trust provides otherwise, it shall be construed to impose and confer upon the parties and beneficiaries the following duties, rights, and obligations in like manner as if the same were expressly provided for by such deed of trust:

The deed shall be construed as given to secure the performance of each of the covenants entered into by the grantor as well as the payment of the primary obligation.

The grantor shall be deemed to covenant that he will pay all taxes, levies, assessments, and charges upon the property, including the fees and charges of such agents or attorneys as the trustee may deem advisable to employ at any time for the purpose of the trust, so long as any obligation upon the grantor under the deed of trust remains undischarged.

The grantor shall be deemed to covenant that he will keep the improvements on the property in tenantable condition, whether such improvements were on the property when the deed of trust was given or were placed there at a later time.

The grantor shall be deemed to covenant that no waste shall be committed or suffered upon the property.

The grantor shall be deemed to covenant that in the event of his failure to meet any obligations imposed upon him, then the trustee or any beneficiary may, at his option, satisfy such obligations. The money so advanced, with interest as provided in the deed of trust, shall be a part of the debt secured by the deed of trust, in the event of sale to be paid next after the expenses of executing the trust, and shall be otherwise recoverable from the grantor as a debt. In addition, to the extent not otherwise covered, the grantor shall be deemed to covenant that amount advanced or incurred by the trustee or any beneficiary under a deed of trust (i) with respect to an obligation secured by a lien or encumbrance prior to the lien of the deed of trust or (ii) for the protection of the lien secured by the deed of trust, together with interest as provided in the deed of trust, shall be a part of the debt secured by the deed of trust, to be paid next after expenses of executing the trust.

A covenant to pay interest shall be deemed a covenant to pay interest on the principal balance as such rate may vary or be modified from time to time by the parties under the original instruments or agreements or a written agreement of modification, whether or not recorded, and all the interest on the principal secured by the deed of trust shall be on an equal priority with the principal debt secured by the deed of trust, in the event of sale to be paid next after the expenses of executing the trust.Any covenant, otherwise authorized by law, that the lender shall be entitled to share in the gross income or the net income, or the gross rent or revenues, or net rents or revenues of the property, or in any portion of the proceeds or appreciation upon sale or appraisal or similar event, shall be on an equal priority with the principal debt secured by the deed of trust, in the event of sale to be paid next after the expenses of executing the trust, and shall be specified in the recorded deed of trust or other recorded document in order to be notice of record as against subsequent parties.

In the event of default in the payment of the debt secured, or any part thereof, at maturity, or in the payment of interest when due, or of the breach of any of the covenants entered into or imposed upon the grantor, then at the request of any beneficiary the trustee shall forthwith declare all the debts and obligations secured by the deed of trust at once due and payable and may take possession of the property and proceed to sell the same at auction at the premises or in the front of the circuit court building or at such other place in the county or city in which the property or the greater part thereof lies, or in the corporate limits of any city surrounded by or contiguous to such county, or in the case of annexed land, in the county of which the land was formerly a part, as the trustee may select upon such terms and conditions as the trustee may deem best.

If the sale is upon credit terms, the deferred purchase money shall bear interest from the day of sale and shall be secured by a deed of trust upon the property contemporaneous with the trustee’s deed to the purchaser.

The party secured by the deed of trust, or the holders of greater than 50 percent of the monetary obligations secured thereby, shall have the right and power to appoint one or more substitute trustees for any reason and, regardless of whether such right and power is expressly granted in such deed of trust, by executing and acknowledging an instrument designating and appointing a substitute. When the instrument of appointment has been executed, the substitute trustee named therein shall be vested with all the powers, rights, authority, and duties vested in the trustee in the original deed of trust. The instrument of appointment shall be recorded in the office of the clerk in which the original deed of trust is recorded prior to or at the time of recordation of any instrument in which a power, right, authority, or duty conferred by the original deed of trust is exercised.

In the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, the trustee of such deed of trust shall not sell the property secured by the deed of trust without receiving an affidavit signed by the party that provided the notice required by §

55.1-321

confirming the notice was sent to the owner, with a copy of such notice attached to the affidavit. Prior to commencing a foreclosure sale with respect to such real estate, the trustee shall provide copies of such affidavit and notice, with any personal financial information redacted, to each potential bidder.

History.

Code 1919, § 5167; 1922, p. 364; 1926, p. 591; 1940, p. 879; 1944, p. 481; Code 1950, § 55-59; 1952, c. 370; 1954, c. 557; 1956, c. 674; 1960, c. 5; 1964, c. 501; 1968, c. 786; 1970, c. 12; 1973, c. 341; 1976, c. 257; 1977, cc. 151, 314, 660; 1979, c. 12; 1980, c. 709; 1981, c. 591; 1992, cc. 87, 193; 1993, c. 426; 1994, c. 551; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 91, 92.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 91 and 92, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added subdivision 10.

Law Review.

For article, “Avoidance of Foreclosure Sales as Fraudulent Conveyances: Accommodating State and Federal Objectives,” see 71 Va. L. Rev. 933 (1985).

For article, “Do Product Bans Help Consumers? Questioning the Economic Foundations of Dodd-Frank Mortgage Regulation,” see 23 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 617 (2016).

For essay, “Foreclosure of a Deed of Trust in Virginia,” see 51 U. Rich. L. Rev. 147 (2016).

§ 55.1-321.
Notices required before sale by trustee to owners, lienors, etc.; if note lost.

In addition to the advertisement required by §

55.1-322

, the trustee or the party secured shall give written notice of the time, date, and place of any proposed sale in execution of a deed of trust, and such notice shall include either (i) the instrument number or deed book and page numbers of the instrument of appointment filed pursuant to §

55.1-320

, or (ii) a copy of the executed and notarized appointment of substitute trustee by personal delivery or by mail to (a) the present owner of the property to be sold at his last known address as such owner and address appear in the records of the party secured; (b) any subordinate lienholder who holds a note against the property secured by a deed of trust recorded at least 75 days, in the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, or 30 days, in the case of all other deeds of trust, prior to the proposed sale and whose address is recorded with the deed of trust; (c) any assignee of such a note secured by a deed of trust, provided that the assignment and address of assignee are likewise recorded at least 75 days, in the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, or 30 days, in the case of all other deeds of trust, prior to the proposed sale; (d) any condominium unit owners’ association that has filed a lien pursuant to §

55.1-1966

; (e) any property owners’ association that has filed a lien pursuant to §

55.1-1833

; and (f) any proprietary lessees’ association that has filed a lien pursuant to §

55.1-2148

. Written notice shall be given pursuant to clauses (d), (e), and (f) only if the lien is recorded at least 75 days, in the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, or 30 days, in the case of all other deeds of trust, prior to the proposed sale. If the secured party has received notification that the owner of the property to be sold is deceased, the notice required by clause (a) shall be given to (1) the last known address of such owner as such address appears in the records of the party secured; (2) any personal representative of the deceased’s estate whose appointment is recorded among the records of the circuit court where the property is located, at the address of the personal representative that appears in such records; and (3) any heirs of the deceased who are listed on the list of heirs recorded among the records of the circuit court where the property is located, at the addresses of the heirs that appear in such records. Mailing of a copy of the advertisement or a notice containing the same information to the owner by certified or registered mail no less than 60 days prior to such sale, in the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, or 14 days prior to such sale, in the case of all other deeds of trust, and to lienholders, the property owners’ association or proprietary lessees’ association, their assigns, and the condominium unit owners’ association, at the address noted in the memorandum of lien, by ordinary mail no less than 60 days prior to such sale, in the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, or 14 days prior to such sale, in the case of all other deeds of trust, shall be a sufficient compliance with the requirement of notice. The written notice of proposed sale when given as provided in this subsection shall be deemed an effective exercise of any right of acceleration contained in such deed of trust or otherwise possessed by the party secured relative to the indebtedness secured. The inadvertent failure to give notice as required by this subsection shall not impose liability on either the trustee or the secured party. The foreclosure sale cannot go forward unless the trustee has proof that the notice has been sent.

If a note or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a deed of trust is lost or for any reason cannot be produced and the beneficiary submits to the trustee an affidavit to that effect, the trustee may nonetheless proceed to sale, provided that the beneficiary has given written notice to the person required to pay the instrument that the instrument is unavailable and a request for sale will be made of the trustee upon expiration of 60 days from the date of mailing of the notice, in the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, or 14 days from the date of mailing of the notice, in the case of all other deeds of trust. The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the person required to pay the instrument as reflected in the records of the beneficiary and shall include the name and mailing address of the trustee. The notice shall further advise the person required to pay the instrument that if he believes he may be subject to a claim by a person other than the beneficiary to enforce the instrument, he may petition the circuit court of the county or city where the property or some part thereof lies for an order requiring the beneficiary to provide adequate protection against any such claim. If deemed appropriate by the court, the court may condition the sale on a finding that the person required to pay the instrument is adequately protected against loss that might occur by reason of a claim by another person to enforce the instrument. Adequate protection may be provided by any reasonable means. If the trustee proceeds to sale, the fact that the instrument is lost or cannot be produced shall not affect the authority of the trustee to sell or the validity of the sale.

When the written notice of proposed sale is given as provided in this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that the lienholder has complied with any requirement to provide notice of default contained in a deed of trust. Failure to comply with the requirements of notice contained in this section shall not affect the validity of the sale, and a purchaser for value at such sale shall be under no duty to ascertain whether such notice was validly given.

In the event of postponement of sale, which may be done in the discretion of the trustee, no new or additional notice is required to be given pursuant to this section.

In the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, the notice to the owner in subsections A and B shall include the website address of the U.S. Housing and Urban Development’s (HUD) Office of Housing Counseling with a listing of HUD-certified housing counseling agencies, the website address and telephone number of the statewide legal aid center, and the following language, or language that is substantially similar, in at least 12-point type: “This is NOT a notice to vacate the premises. You should consider contacting an attorney or your local legal aid or housing counseling agency.”

In the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, the notice to the owner in subsections A and B shall include the date of the last payment received and the amount received; the total amount of principal, interest, costs, and fees due in arrears; and the remaining total principal balance due on the instrument.

History.

1979, c. 12, § 55-59.1; 1992, c. 739; 1993, c. 597; 1994, c. 143; 2004, c. 1001; 2009, c. 307; 2018, cc. 34, 204; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 91, 92.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 91 and 92, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development shall convene a stakeholder group consisting of landlords, property managers, and tenants, as well as attorneys knowledgeable in the Virginia Manufactured Home Lot Rental Act (§

55.1-1300

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and other applicable provisions of the Code of Virginia for the purposes of providing input into (i) the development of the form to be developed by the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development for posting on its website pursuant to §

36-139

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, acknowledging that a tenant has received from the landlord the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities and (ii) any updates to the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 91 and 92, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of subsection E of §

55.1-321

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 91 and 92, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “75 days, in the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, or 30 days, in the case of all other deeds of trust,” for “thirty days” twice in the first sentence and once in the second sentence, substituted “60 days prior to such sale, in the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, or 14 days prior to such sale, in the case of all other deeds of trust” for “14 days prior to such sale” twice in the fourth sentence and added the last sentence; in subsection B, substituted “60 days from the date of mailing of the notice, in the case of a deed of trust conveying owner-occupied residential real estate, or 14 days from the date of mailing of the notice, in the case of all other deeds of trust” for “14 days from the date of mailing of the notice” in the first sentence; and added subsections E and F. For effective date for subsection E, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For note on the developing law in Virginia on installment land contracts, see 37 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1161 (1980).

For essay, “Foreclosure of a Deed of Trust in Virginia,” see 51 U. Rich. L. Rev. 147 (2016).

§ 55.1-322.
Advertisement required before sale by trustee.

Advertisement of sale by a trustee or trustees in execution of a deed of trust shall be in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county or city in which the property to be sold, or any portion of such property, lies pursuant to the following provisions:

If the deed of trust itself provides for the number of publications of such newspaper advertisement, which may be done by using the words “advertisement required” or similar words followed by the number agreed upon, then no other or different advertisement shall be necessary, provided that, if such advertisement be inserted on a weekly basis, it shall be published not less than once a week for two weeks, and if such advertisement be inserted on a daily basis, it shall be published not less than once a day for three days, which may be consecutive days, and in either case shall be subject to the provisions of §

55.1-330

in the same manner as if the method were set forth in the deed of trust. Should the deed of trust provide for advertising on other than a weekly or daily basis, either of the foregoing provisions shall be complied with in addition to those provided in such deed of trust. Notwithstanding the provisions of the deed of trust, the sale shall be held on any day following the day of the last advertisement that is no earlier than eight days following the first advertisement or more than 30 days following the last advertisement.

If the deed of trust does not provide for the number of publications of such newspaper advertisement, the trustee shall advertise once a week for four successive weeks, provided, however, that if the property or some portion of such property is located in a city or in a county immediately contiguous to a city, publication of the advertisement five different days, which may be consecutive days, shall be deemed adequate. The sale shall be held on any day following the day of the last advertisement that is no earlier than eight days following the first advertisement or more than 30 days following the last advertisement.

Such advertisement shall be placed in that section of the newspaper where legal notices appear or where the type of property being sold is generally advertised for sale.

In addition to the advertisement required by subsection A, the trustee shall give such other further and different advertisement as the deed of trust may require and in addition may give such additional advertisement as he may deem appropriate.

In the event of postponement of sale, which postponement shall be at the discretion of the trustee, advertisement of such postponed sale shall be in the same manner as the original advertisement of sale.

Failure to comply with the requirements for advertisement contained in this section shall, upon petition, render a sale of the property voidable by the court.

History.

1979, c. 12, § 55-59.2; 1990, c. 749; 1992, c. 550; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For essay, “Foreclosure of a Deed of Trust in Virginia,” see 51 U. Rich. L. Rev. 147 (2016).